Hawaii statutes.
§657-19 Extension by injunction.
Whenever the commencement of any action is stayed by an injunction of any
court, the time during which the injunction is in force shall not be deemed any
portion of the time limited in this part or section 663-3 for the commencement
of the action. [CC 1859, §1043; RL 1925, §2653; RL 1935, §3924; RL 1945,
§10435; RL 1955, §241-18; HRS §657-19; am L 1972, c 105, §1(k)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next